Texas, session 892, HB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter Z, Chapter 271, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 271.909 to read as follows: Sec. 271.909.  CERTAIN CONTRACTING CRITERIA PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "governmental agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 271.003. (b)  Notwithstanding any other law, a governmental agency that procures a good or service through a competitive process may not: (1)  consider any factor in the procurement process other than a factor that: (A)  is required by law; or (B)  is objective, measurable, and directly related to the cost, quality, reliability, or legal compliance of the good or service being procured; or (2)  give a preference to a bid based on environmental, social, and governance criteria that do not directly relate to the cost, quality, reliability, or legal compliance of the good or service being procured. (c)  For a competitive procurement process, a governmental agency shall: (1)  provide written contract selection criteria in all publicly available bid specification requirements; and (2)  include written contract selection criteria in the solicitation documents at the time of vendor solicitation. (d)  A person may submit to the attorney general a suspected violation of this section. (e)  If the attorney general determines that a governmental agency has violated this section: (1)  if the procurement process is ongoing and a contract has not been awarded, the attorney general shall direct the governmental agency in writing to remove any contract selection criteria that the attorney general determines are prohibited under this section; or (2)  if a contract has been awarded but has not been executed or performance of the contract has not been completed: (A)  the attorney general shall direct the governmental agency in writing to terminate the contract not later than the 10th day after the date the governmental agency receives the notice; and (B)  the governmental agency shall provide written proof of the termination of the contract to the attorney general within the period prescribed by Paragraph (A). (f)  If a governmental agency fails to terminate a contract or provide written proof of the termination of a contract to the attorney general as required by and within the period prescribed by Subsection (e)(2), the contract is void. (g)  The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive or declaratory relief to enforce this section if a governmental agency fails to comply with this section. SECTION 2.  Section 271.909, Local Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a contractor selection process initiated on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.